Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1704
Professional services, defined.

Professional services shall mean those services within the scope of the practice of architecture, professional engineering, landscape architecture, or professional land surveying as defined by the laws of the state, or those performed by any architect, professional engineer, landscape architect, or professional land surveyor in connection with his or her professional employment practice.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 47.
September 1, 2024